apertium-olo.olo.lexc
LEXICON NUM-PRL
@U.DECL-CX.PRL@%<prl%>00:@U.DECL-CX.PRL@%>či SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-TER
@U.DECL-CX.TER@%<term%>0000:@U.DECL-CX.TER@%>ss%{aä%}h SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

LEXICON NUM-TRA
@U.DECL-CX.TRA@%<tra%>000:@U.DECL-CX.TRA@%>kse SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;


LEXICON NO-SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT
 K ;

LEXICON SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT
 K ;
ONLY-SUBSEQUENT-NUM ;

LEXICON ONLY-SUBSEQUENT-NUM
»tostu:»tostu K ;
#kymmene:#kymmen NUM_KYMMENE ;
#sada:#sada NUM_SADA ;
#tuhat:#tuha NUM_TUHAT ;
NUM-STEMS ;

@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.NOM@#kymmene%<num%>%<card%>%<sg%>%<par%>:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@@U.DECL-CX.NOM@#kymmendy000 SUBSEQUENT-NUM_OPT ;

#toine:#to ORD_TOINE ;
#enzimäine:#ensimä ORD_LIYGILÄINE ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Proper noun inflection

!! Erzya proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns.

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!! Male given name for deriving patronyms 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Andrʼej:Andrʼe
LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich
+Orth/Colloq:ič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:jevič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:jevna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:%>%{ijPRC%} PROP_OSTAI_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich
+Orth/Colloq:ʼič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ʼjevič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ʼjevna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:ii PROP_PAGIZII_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich
+Orth/Colloq:ʼič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ijevič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ijevna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:ii PROP_PAGIZII_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Y-0Evich
+Orth/Colloq:ič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:jevič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:jevna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:ʼ PROP_ABRAMOV_MAL ;

!! Vili:Vil
LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich
+Orth/Colloq:ič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ʼjevič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ʼjevna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
:i PROP_KAL_MAL ;


LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Ovich
+Orth/Colloq:šč PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ovič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL ;
:ovna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM ;
 PROP_KAL_MAL ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Russian type Surnames 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Abdʼejev:Abdʼejev
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;
:a PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

!! Bagrij:Bagr
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL
:ii PROP_PAGIZII_MAL ;
:jaja PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

!! Amorskij:Amorsk
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL
:ii PROP_PAGIZII_MAL ;
:aja PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL
:oj PROP_KAL_SURMAL ;
:aja PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-HIJ_SURMAL
:šʼ PROP_KAL_SURMAL ;
:aja PROP_KUDO_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL
 Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL
 Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL ;


LEXICON PROP_KAL_SURMAL
%<n%>%<np%>: # ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SURFEM
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_KALA ;

LEXICON PROP_OSTAI_FEM
%<n%>%<np%>:%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_OSTAI ;
LEXICON PROP_OSTAI_MAL
%<n%>%<np%>:%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_OSTAI ;

LEXICON CYRL-CONS_SUR
 PROP_KAL_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_KAL_SUR
%<n%>%<np%>: # ;



LEXICON CYRL-T_SUR
 PROP_KIT_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_KIT_SUR
 PROP_KAL_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-K_SUR
 PROP_LAK_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_LAK_SUR
 PROP_KAL_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR
 PROP_OŠ_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_SUR
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON CYRL-VOW_SUR
 PROP_KUDO_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-A_SUR
 PROP_KUDO_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SUR
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_KALA ;

LEXICON PROP_PAGIZII_MAL
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_PAGIZII ;

LEXICON PROP_PAGIZII_SURMAL
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_PAGIZII ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PLACE NAMES FROM TEMPLATES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP-PLC_KAL
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KIT
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_OŠ
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KUDO
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_KALA ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Erzya settlements !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_KAL
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_KIT
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_OŠ
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_PANGO
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ ;

LEXICON PROP-SETTLEMENT_KUDO
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_KALA ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Divinities !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL_DIVINITY
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_DIVINITY
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_PANGO_DIVINITY
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_DIVINITY
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_KALA ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Constellations !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL_CONSTELLATION
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_CONSTELLATION
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV  ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ-PL_CONSTELLATION
%<n%>%<np%>%<pl%>: NMN_ABRAMOV-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_PANGO_CONSTELLATION
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_CONSTELLATION
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_KALA ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO-PL_CONSTELLATION
%<n%>%<np%>%<pl%>: NMN_KALA-PL ; 

LEXICON PROP_TJeŠTJe_CONSTELLATION
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! TEXT NAMES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL_TXT
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_TXT
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV  ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_TXT
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_KALA ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! HOLIDAYS !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL_HOLIDAY
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_HOLIDAY
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV  ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_HOLIDAY
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_KALA ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! RIVER NAMES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL_RIVERS
%<n%>%<np%>+Rvr: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_RIVERS
%<n%>%<np%>+Rvr: NMN_ABRAMOV  ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_RIVERS
%<n%>%<np%>+Rvr: NMN_KALA ;


!!
LEXICON PROP_KAL
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_LAK
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_KIT
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_TJeŠTJe
 N_RUNO ;

LEXICON PROP_TINGJe
 N_RUNO ;

LEXICON PROP_PANGO
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_KALA ;



LEXICON PROP_KAL_MAL
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;
LEXICON PROP_ABRAMOV_MAL
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;
LEXICON PROP_ABRAMOV_FEM
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_LAK_MAL
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_KIT_MAL
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_MAL
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV  ;

LEXICON PROP_TJeŠTJe_MAL
 PROP_PANGO_MAL ;

LEXICON PROP_TINGJe_MAL
 PROP_PANGO_MAL ;

LEXICON PROP_PANGO_MAL
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_MAL
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_KALA ;

LEXICON PROP_KAL_FEM
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_LAK_FEM
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_KIT_FEM
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_OŠ_FEM
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV  ;

LEXICON PROP_TJeŠTJe_FEM
 PROP_PANGO_FEM ;

LEXICON PROP_TINGJe_FEM
 PROP_PANGO_FEM ;

LEXICON PROP_PANGO_FEM
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_FEM
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_KALA ;


LEXICON PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_ABRAMOV ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM
%<n%>%<np%>: NMN_KALA ;

!! DECLENSION LIMITATIONS

LEXICON PROP_KUDO-PL
%<n%>%<np%>%<pl%>: NMN_KALA-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SUB
: PROP_KUDO ;

LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SH
+Use/Short: PROP_KUDO ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! !!!Symbol affixes

LEXICON Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected
 %<n%>%<sym%>: SYMBOL_connector ;

LEXICON Noun_symbols_never_inflected
 %<n%>%<sym%>: # ;

LEXICON SYMBOL_connector
               SYMBOL_NO_suff ; ! §
          :%:  SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §:sne
 :    SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §esne
 :%-e SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §-esne
 :%'e SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §'esne

LEXICON SYMBOL_NO_suff
 %<sg%>%<nom%>: # ;

LEXICON rus-Cyrl-2-Lat-ProperNouns
Bʼesprozvannšʼ:Bʼesprozvann Deriv-RUS-HIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Borovʼenskij:Borovʼensk Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Borsukov:Borsukov Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL "Z" ;
Bosšh:Bosšh CYRL-CONS_SUR "Z" ;
Brožko:Brožko CYRL-VOW_SUR "Z" ;
Bruhtij:Bruht Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Burkot:Burkot CYRL-T_SUR "Z" ;
Vajcʼehovič:Vajcʼehovič CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR "Z" ;
Vatin:Vatin Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Volček:Volček CYRL-K_SUR "Z" ;
Voskovskij:Voskovsk Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Gajevoj:Gajev Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Gaman:Gaman Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Giršbʼerg:Giršbʼerg CYRL-CONS_SUR "Z" ;
Govzan:Govzan Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Govorko:Govorko CYRL-VOW_SUR "Z" ;
Golivʼec:Golivʼec CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR "Z" ;
Gorničnšʼ:Gorničn Deriv-RUS-HIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Grot:Grot CYRL-T_SUR "Z" ;
Grudovšʼ:Grudov Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Gusan:Gusan Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Davlʼetgilʼdʼejev:Davlʼetgilʼdʼejev Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL "Z" ;
Dššlʼevoj:Dššlʼev Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Jepišin:Jepišin Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Jerʼebakan:Jerʼebakan Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Žarik:Žarik CYRL-K_SUR "Z" ;
Zatinackij:Zatinack Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Zajarnšʼ:Zajarn Deriv-RUS-HIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Zʼuba:Zʼuba CYRL-A_SUR "Z" ;
Karšʼ:Kar Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Kucʼenko:Kucʼenko CYRL-VOW_SUR "Z" ;
Lanovoj:Lanov Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Mogila:Mogila CYRL-A_SUR "Z" ;
Mordvincʼev:Mordvincʼev Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL "Z" ;
Pʼenʼkovšʼ:Pʼenʼkov Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Pʼetšgin:Pʼetšgin Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Pʼecʼevič:Pʼecʼevič CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR "Z" ;
Polʼevoj:Polʼev Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Popovskij:Popovsk Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Sagajdačnšʼ:Sagajdačn Deriv-RUS-HIJ_SURMAL "Z" ;
Finogʼejev:Finogʼejev Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL "Z" ;
Fisun:Fisun CYRL-CONS_SUR "Z" ;
Čenčik:Čenčik CYRL-K_SUR "Z" ;
Ejsmont:Ejsmont CYRL-T_SUR "Z" ;
Juffa:Juffa CYRL-A_SUR "Z" ;
Jakin:Jakin Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL "Z" ;
Asa:Asa PROP_KUDO_MAL "Z" ;
Afinogʼen:Afinogʼen PropNameMaleDer-Ovich  "Z" ;
Boaz:Boaz PROP_OŠ_MAL "Z" ;
Gʼeralʼd:Gʼeralʼd PropNameMaleDer-Ovich  "Z" ;
Ijessʼej:Ijessʼe PROP_OSTAI_MAL "Z" ;
Iisus:Iisus PROP_OŠ_MAL "Z" ;
Iosafat:Iosafat PROP_KIT_MAL "Z" ;
Isajja:Isajja PROP_KUDO_MAL "Z" ;
Iskariot:Iskariot PROP_KIT_SUR "Z" ;
Lʼebbʼej:Lʼebbʼe PROP_OSTAI_MAL "Z" ;
Maksimilʼjan:Maksimilʼjan PropNameMaleDer-Ovich  "Z" ;
Mihail:Mihajlovna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM "Z" ;
Nahšon:Nahšon PROP_ABRAMOV_MAL "Z" ;
Pavol:Pavlovič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL  "Z" ;
Pavol:Pavlovna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM  "Z" ;
Pʼerʼes:Pʼerʼes PROP_OŠ_MAL "Z" ;
Pʼotr:Pʼetrovič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL  "Z" ;
Pʼotr:Pʼetrovna PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM  "Z" ;
Sadok:Sadok PROP_LAK_MAL "Z" ;
Silʼvʼestr:Silʼvʼestr PropNameMaleDer-Ovich  "Z" ;
Urija:Urija PROP_KUDO_MAL "Z" ;
Hristos:Hristos PROP_OŠ_SUR "Z" ;
Elʼeazar:Elʼeazar PROP_ABRAMOV_MAL "Z" ;
Arkʼelaj:Arkʼela PROP_OSTAI_MAL "Z" ;
Arsʼenij:Arsʼen PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich  "Z" ;
Vasilij:Vasil PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich  "Z" ;
Galij:Gal PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich  "Z" ;
Gʼeorgij:Gʼeorgi PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich  "Z" ;
Grigorij:Grigor PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich  "Z" ;
Jevsʼevʼjevič:Jevsʼevʼjevič PROP_OŠ_PATRMAL "Z" ;
Jerʼemʼej:Jerʼemʼe PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich  "Z" ;
Zorovavʼelʼ:Zorovavʼelʼ PROP_KAL_MAL "Z" ;
Ignatij:Ignat PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich  "Z" ;
Klimʼentij:Klimʼent PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich  "Z" ;
Lʼevkij:Lʼevki PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich  "Z" ;
Prokopij:Prokop PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich  "Z" ;
Sʼergʼej:Sʼergʼe PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich  "Z" ;
Fotij:Fot PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich  "Z" ;
Francʼ:Franc PropNameMaleDer-Y-0Evich  "Z" ;
Gabrijeli:Gabrijel PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich  "Z" ;
Igori:Igor PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich  "Z" ;
Naili:Nail PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich  "Z" ;
Juri:Jur PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich  "Z" ;
Vlasta:Vlasta PROP_KUDO_FEM "Z" ;
Zʼerah:Zʼerah PROP_ABRAMOV_MAL "Z" ;
Katʼuša:Katʼuša PROP_KUDO_FEM "Z" ;
Loris:Loris PROP_OŠ_FEM "Z" ;
Lʼubovʼ:Lʼubovʼ PROP_ABRAMOV_FEM "Z" ;
Olʼesʼ:Olʼesʼ PROP_OŠ_FEM "Z" ;
Olʼdaj:Olʼda PROP_OSTAI_FEM "Z" ;
Rahilʼ:Rahilʼ PROP_ABRAMOV_FEM "Z" ;
Rut:Rut PROP_KIT_FEM "Z" ;
Erna:Erna PROP_KUDO_FEM "Z" ;
Estʼer:Estʼer PROP_ABRAMOV_FEM "Z" ;
Janis:Janis PROP_OŠ_FEM "Z" ;
